Maryland, session 2025, SB0381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–321.

SENATE BILL 381 3
(a) In this section, “RECORDED IMAGE” OR “recorded images” has the meaning
stated in § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
(2) AN AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEM OPERATED UNDER § 21–704.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(3) A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA OPERATED UNDER §
21–706.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(4) A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED UNDER § 21–707.1
OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
[(2)] (5) a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
[(3)] (6) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article; [or]
(7) A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED UNDER §
21–1134 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(8) A NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED UNDER §
22–612 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; OR
[(4)] (9) a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of
the Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:
(1) as required in § 12–113.1, § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, §
21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article;
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the person; or

SENATE BILL 381
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under §
21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612,
or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
Article – Transportation
12–113.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGENCY” MEANS A STATE POLICE DEPARTMENT, THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, A LOCAL POLICE DEPARTMENT, OR ANOTHER LOCAL
AGENCY THAT IMPLEMENTS AND OPERATES AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT
PROGRAM.
(3) “APPROPRIATE TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PURPOSE” MEANS THE
DETECTION, INVESTIGATION, OR ANALYSIS OF, OR ASSESSMENT OR ADJUDICATION
OF LIABILITY FOR, A VIOLATION.
(4) “AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT” MEANS THE USE OF CAMERAS,
MONITORING DEVICES, AND OTHER TECHNOLOGY BY AN AGENCY TO CAPTURE
RECORDED IMAGES OF A MOTOR VEHICLE BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF A
TRAFFIC LAW.
(5) “FACIAL RECOGNITION TECHNOLOGY” MEANS A BIOMETRIC
SOFTWARE APPLICATION THAT IDENTIFIES OR VERIFIES THE IDENTITY OF AN
INDIVIDUAL BY COMPARING AND ANALYZING PATTERNS BASED ON AN INDIVIDUAL’S
FACIAL CONTOURS.
(6) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–201 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(6) (7) “PROGRAM” MEANS AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT
PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED AND OPERATED BY AN AGENCY.
(7) (8) “RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA” MEANS ANY
IMAGE OR DATA RECORDED UNDER A PROGRAM BY ELECTRONIC OR DIGITAL MEANS,
BY PHOTOGRAPHIC MEANS, OR BY WAY OF ANY OTHER MEDIUM THAT:
(I) SHOWS A MOTOR VEHICLE;

SENATE BILL 381 5
(II) CLEARLY IDENTIFIES THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
(III) MAY CONSTITUTE EVIDENCE OF A VIOLATION.
(8) (9) “VIOLATION” MEANS A TRAFFIC VIOLATION THAT A
PARTICULAR AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM IS INTENDED TO CAPTURE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER §
21–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–704.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERAS UNDER § 21–706.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(4) STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–707.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(5) SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–809 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(6) WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–810 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(7) BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–1134 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(8) NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 22–612 OF
THIS ARTICLE;
(9) VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 24–111.3 OF
THIS ARTICLE; AND
(10) ANY OTHER AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM
AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN AGENCY MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE A RECORDED IMAGE OR
ASSOCIATED DATA WITHOUT A WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR COURT ORDER UNLESS
THE ACCESS OR USE IS FOR AN APPROPRIATE TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PURPOSE.

SENATE BILL 381
(2) AN AGENCY MAY ACCESS AND USE A RECORDED IMAGE AND
ASSOCIATED DATA WITHOUT A WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR COURT ORDER IN EXIGENT
CIRCUMSTANCES.
(I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY ACCESS AND USE A RECORDED IMAGE OR
ASSOCIATED DATA ALREADY RETAINED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IF:
1. THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY DOCUMENTS A
REQUEST TO ACCESS AND USE THE RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA THAT
ARTICULATES A SPECIFIC LEGITIMATE LAW ENFORCEMENT PURPOSE FOR
ACCESSING AND USING THE RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA; AND
2. THE CUSTODIAN OF THE RECORDED IMAGE OR
ASSOCIATED DATA MAINTAINS A WRITTEN RECORD OF THE REQUEST AND WHETHER
OR NOT THE REQUEST WAS GRANTED.
(II) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT ACCESSES A
RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY USE THE
RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA ONLY FOR THE LEGITIMATE LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSE DESCRIBED IN THE REQUEST REQUIRED BY
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(3) AN EMPLOYEE OR A CONTRACTOR OF AN AGENCY MAY ACCESS
AND USE A RECORDED IMAGE AND ASSOCIATED DATA:
(I) TO ADMINISTER AND PROCESS CITATIONS OR TO AUDIT OR
EVALUATE THE ACCURACY OF THE AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM; AND
(II) IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) AN AGENCY THAT KNOWINGLY VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(D) (1) AN AGENCY SHALL IMMEDIATELY REMOVE FROM ITS RECORDS
AND DESTROY ANY RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA CAPTURED UNDER A
PROGRAM THAT DOES NOT CONSTITUTE EVIDENCE OF A VIOLATION.
(2) A RECORDED IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA CAPTURED UNDER A
PROGRAM THAT CONSTITUTES EVIDENCE OF A VIOLATION MAY BE RETAINED ONLY
FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS OR UNTIL THE CONCLUSION OF ANY CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION
OR CRIMINAL OR CIVIL COURT ACTION INVOLVING THE RECORDED IMAGE OR
ASSOCIATED DATA UNTIL THE EARLIER OF:

SENATE BILL 381 7
(I) 1 YEAR FOLLOWING THE CONCLUSION OF ANY CRIMINAL
INVESTIGATION OR THE EXHAUSTION OF ALL THE AVENUES OF ADJUDICATION FOR
THE VIOLATION; OR
(II) 5 YEARS AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE RECORDED IMAGE
OR ASSOCIATED DATA WAS CAPTURED.
(3) BEFORE AN AGENCY REMOVES AND DESTROYS A RECORDED
IMAGE OR ASSOCIATED DATA, THE AGENCY MAY DISAGGREGATE THE DATA FOR
ANALYSIS PURPOSES IN A MANNER THAT DOES NOT IDENTIFY ANY INDIVIDUAL OR
VEHICLE.
(E) (1) AN AGENCY THAT IMPLEMENTS AND OPERATES A PROGRAM
SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES RELATING TO THE OPERATION OF THE PROGRAM AND
THE USE OF AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMS.
(2) THE PROCEDURES SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY THE EMPLOYEE CLASSIFICATIONS IN THE
AGENCY THAT HAVE AUTHORIZATION TO ACCESS OR USE RECORDED IMAGES AND
ASSOCIATED DATA PRODUCED BY AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM;
(II) ESTABLISH AN AUDIT PROCESS TO ENSURE THAT
INFORMATION OBTAINED THROUGH THE USE OF AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEM IS USED ONLY FOR APPROPRIATE TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES AS
AUTHORIZED IN THIS SECTION;
(III) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES AND SAFEGUARDS TO ENSURE
THAT AGENCY PERSONNEL WITH ACCESS TO RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED
DATA ARE ADEQUATELY SCREENED AND TRAINED;
(IV) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES AND SAFEGUARDS FOR THE
SECURE STORAGE OF THE RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA BEFORE THE
IMAGES AND DATA ARE REMOVED AND DESTROYED; AND
(V) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR THE REMOVAL AND
DESTRUCTION OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA.
(F) (1) RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA SHALL BE STORED
USING SOFTWARE THAT IS INDEPENDENT FROM AND INACCESSIBLE TO OTHER
SYSTEMS AND NETWORKS.

SENATE BILL 381
(2) AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM SHALL BE SITUATED AND
FOCUSED IN A MANNER THAT:
(I) CAPTURES RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA OF
VIOLATIONS; AND
(II) TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT POSSIBLE, DOES NOT CAPTURE
IDENTIFYING IMAGES OF THE DRIVER, OTHER DRIVERS OR VEHICLES, OR
PEDESTRIANS.
(3) AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM MAY NOT USE
BIOMETRIC IDENTIFYING TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING FACIAL RECOGNITION
TECHNOLOGY.
(4) (I) AN AGENCY OR A CONTRACTOR OF AN AGENCY MAY NOT
SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER OR SHARE RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED
DATA WITH ANOTHER PERSON OTHER THAN:
1. A PERSON ALLEGED TO BE LIABLE FOR A CIVIL
VIOLATION RECORDED BY AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM;
2. A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION WHEN
ADJUDICATING LIABILITY; OR
3. ANOTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FOR USE
ONLY IN AN ONGOING INVESTIGATION:, AFTER THE OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY HAS OBTAINED AN APPROPRIATE WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR COURT ORDER.
A. AFTER THE OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY HAS
OBTAINED AN APPROPRIATE WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR COURT ORDER; OR
B. IN EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES.
(II) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT RECEIVES RECORDED
IMAGES OR ASSOCIATED DATA UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)3 OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS
SUBJECT TO THE PROHIBITIONS AND REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
21–202.1.
(c) This section applies to a violation of § 21–202(h) of this subtitle at an
intersection monitored by a traffic control signal monitoring system.

SENATE BILL 381 9
(j) (1) In consultation with local governments, the chief judge of the District
Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, the trial of civil violations, and
the collection of civil penalties under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–704.1.
(b) This section applies only in Montgomery County and Prince George’s County.
(e) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (h)(5) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by an automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system during the
commission of a violation.
(k) (1) In consultation with local law enforcement agencies in Montgomery
County and Prince George’s County, the Chief Judge of the District Court shall adopt
procedures for the issuance of citations, the trial of violations, and the collection of civil
penalties under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–706.1.
(c) (1) A school bus monitoring camera may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(k) (1) In consultation with law enforcement agencies, the Chief Judge of the
District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, trials for violations, and
the collection of civil penalties imposed under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–707.1.

SENATE BILL 381
(c) (2) A stop sign monitoring system:
(i) May not be used in a local jurisdiction under this section unless
its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction by local law enacted
after reasonable notice and a public hearing; and
(ii) May only be used at a location approved by the Prince George’s
County Council.
(k) (1) In consultation with law enforcement agencies, the Chief Judge of the
District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, trials for violations, and
the collection of civil penalties imposed under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–809.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(i) (1) In consultation with the appropriate local government agencies, the
Chief Judge of the District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, the
trial of civil violations, and the collection of civil penalties under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–810.
(b) (1) A work zone speed control system that meets the requirements of this
subsection may be used to record the images of motor vehicles traveling on a highway:
(i) Within a work zone; and
(ii) On which the speed limit, as posted before the work zone was
implemented and established using generally accepted traffic engineering practices, is 45
miles per hour or greater.

SENATE BILL 381 11
(i) (1) In consultation with local police departments and State police
departments, the Chief Judge of the District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance
of citations, the trial of civil violations, and the collection of civil penalties under this
section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–1134.
(b) (1) An agency may use a bus lane monitoring system that meets the
requirements of this subsection to record the images of motor vehicles during the
commission of a violation.
(k) (1) In consultation with the appropriate local government agencies, the
Chief Judge of the District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, trials
for violations, and the collection of civil penalties imposed under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
22–612.
(c) (1) (i) A county may use not more than three noise abatement
monitoring systems under this section if the use is authorized by the county governing body
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(j) (1) In consultation with the appropriate county agencies, the Chief Judge
of the District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, the trial of civil
violations, and the collection of civil penalties under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
24–111.3.
(b) This section applies only in Baltimore City, Baltimore County, Harford
County, and Prince George’s County.

SENATE BILL 381
(c) (1) A vehicle height monitoring system may be used to record images of
vehicles traveling on a highway in a local jurisdiction under this section only if the use of
vehicle height monitoring systems is authorized by local law adopted by the governing body
of the local jurisdiction after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(j) (1) In consultation with the appropriate local government agency, the
Chief Judge of the District Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, the
trial of civil violations, and the collection of civil penalties under this section.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–321.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
(2) an automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system operated
under § 21–704.1 of the Transportation Article;
(3) a school bus monitoring camera operated under §
21–706.1 of the Transportation Article;
(4) a stop sign monitoring system operated under § 21–707.1 of the
Transportation Article;
(5) a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
(6) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article;
(7) a bus lane monitoring system operated under §
21–1134 of the Transportation Article; OR

SENATE BILL 381 13
(8) [a noise abatement monitoring system operated under § 22–612 of the
Transportation Article; or
(9)] a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:
(1) as required in § 12–113.1, § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, §
21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, [§ 22–612,] or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article;
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, [§ 22–612,] or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the person; or
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under §
21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, [§ 22–612,]
or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
Article – Transportation
12–113.1.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) Traffic control signal monitoring systems under §
21–202.1 of this article;
(2) Automated railroad grade crossing enforcement systems under §
21–704.1 of this article;
(3) School bus monitoring cameras under § 21–706.1 of this article;
(4) Stop sign monitoring systems under § 21–707.1 of this article;
(5) Speed monitoring systems under § 21–809 of this article;
(6) Work zone speed control systems under § 21–810 of this article;
(7) Bus lane monitoring systems under § 21–1134 of this article;
(8) [Noise abatement monitoring systems under § 22–612 of this article;
(9)] Vehicle height monitoring systems under § 24–111.3 of this article; and

SENATE BILL 381
[(10)] (9) Any other automated traffic enforcement system authorized
under State law.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–321.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
(2) an automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system operated
under § 21–704.1 of the Transportation Article;
(3) a school bus monitoring camera operated under §
21–706.1 of the Transportation Article;
(4) [a stop sign monitoring system operated under § 21–707.1 of the
Transportation Article;
(5)] a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
[(6)] (5) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article;
[(7)] (6) a bus lane monitoring system operated under §
21–1134 of the Transportation Article;
[(8)] (7) a noise abatement monitoring system operated under § 22–612
of the Transportation Article; or
[(9)] (8) a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of
the Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:
(1) as required in § 12–113.1, § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, [§
21–707.1,] § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article;

SENATE BILL 381 15
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, [§ 21–707.1,] § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the person; or
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under §
21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, [§ 21–707.1,] § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612,
or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
Article – Transportation
12–113.1.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) Traffic control signal monitoring systems under §
21–202.1 of this article;
(2) Automated railroad grade crossing enforcement systems under §
21–704.1 of this article;
(3) School bus monitoring cameras under § 21–706.1 of this article;
(4) [Stop sign monitoring systems under § 21–707.1 of this article;
(5)] Speed monitoring systems under § 21–809 of this article;
[(6)] (5) Work zone speed control systems under § 21–810 of this article;
[(7)] (6) Bus lane monitoring systems under § 21–1134 of this article;
[(8)] (7) Noise abatement monitoring systems under § 22–612 of this
article;
[(9)] (8) Vehicle height monitoring systems under § 24–111.3 of this
article; and
[(10)] (9) Any other automated traffic enforcement system authorized
under State law.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2026, the termination date of Chapter 625 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2024. If the termination date of Chapter 625 is amended, this Act shall take effect on the
termination of Chapter 625. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that
termination provision.

SENATE BILL 381
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2029, the termination date of Chapter 678 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2024. If the termination date of Chapter 678 is amended, this Act shall take effect on the
termination of Chapter 678. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that
termination provision.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 4 and 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.